Massachusetts, session 194th, H4333.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 176O of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 30 the
following section:-
Section 31. (a) In this Section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
“Insurer” means any health insurance issuer that is subject to state law regulating
insurance and offers health insurance coverage, as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-91, or any state
or local governmental employer plan.
“Cost sharing requirement” means any copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or annual
limitation on cost sharing (including but not limited to a limitation subject to 42 U.S.C. §§
18022(c) and 300gg-6(b)), required by or on behalf of an enrollee in order to receive a specific
health care service, including a prescription drug, covered by a health plan.
“Enrollee” means any individual entitled to health care services from an insurer.
of 3

“Health plan” means a policy, contract, certification, or agreement offered or issued by an
insurer to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of health care
services.
“Health care service” means an item or service furnished to any individual for the
purpose of preventing, alleviating, curing, or healing human illness, injury or physical disability.
“Person” means a natural person, corporation, mutual company, unincorporated
association, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, trust, estate, foundation, not-
for-profit corporation, unincorporated organization, government or governmental subdivision or
agency.
(b) When calculating an enrollee’s contribution to any applicable cost sharing
requirement, an insurer shall include any cost sharing amounts paid by the enrollee or on behalf
of the enrollee by another person. Any cost sharing or reductions made for an enrollee’s benefit
or towards an enrollee’s applicable cost sharing requirement shall be applied in full at the time it
is rendered and wholly towards the enrollee’s out-of-pocket costs, deductible, cost sharing or
similar enrollee obligation. If under Federal law, application of this requirement would result in
health savings account ineligibility under section 223 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code, this
requirement shall apply for health savings account-qualified high-deductible health plans with
respect to the deductible of such a plan after the covered individual has satisfied the minimum
deductible under section 223 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code, except for with respect to
items or services that are preventive care pursuant to section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Federal Internal
Revenue Code, in which case the requirements of this paragraph shall apply regardless of
whether the minimum deductible under section 223 has been satisfied.
of 3

(c) When calculating an enrollee’s contribution to the annual limitation on cost sharing
set forth in 42 U.S.C. §§ 18022(c) and 300gg-6(b), an insurer shall include expenditures for any
health care service covered by the enrollee’s health plan and included within a category of
essential health benefits as described in 42 U.S.C. § 18022(b)(1).
This section shall apply with respect to health plans that are entered into, amended,
extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026.
The Commission may promulgate such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary to
implement this section.
of 3